Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,249
New Taxpayer Recruitment Act, how cited.

Sections 81-12,249 to 81-12,256 shall be known and may be cited as the New Taxpayer Recruitment Grant Act.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 109.
July 18, 2026